Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4479.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2608 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Except as provided for in subsection B of this section,
beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, in order to graduate from
a public high school accredited by the State Board of Education,
students shall complete and submit an application for participation
in the Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program provided for in
Req. No. 15375 Page 1

Sect ion 2602 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes by December 31 of
their twelfth-grade year.
B. A student shall not be required to comply with the
provisions of subsection A of this section if:
1. The student's parent or legal guardian submits a signed form
authorizing the student to opt out of the requirement of subsection
A of this section;
2. A student age eighteen (18) or older submits a signed form
authorizing him or her to opt out of the requirement of subsection A
of this section; or
3. A school counselor authorizes a student to opt out of the
requirement of subsection A of this section.
C. The State Department of Education shall develop and publish
an opt-out form to be used by school districts, charter schools, and
virtual charter schools for the purposes outlined in subsection B of
this section.
D. The Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program contact person
provided for in subsection B of Section 2605 of Title 70 of the
Oklahoma Statutes shall collect information regarding student
compliance with subsection A or B of this section. The collection
and storage of the information shall comply with the Family
Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 (FERPA).
E. The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules to
implement the provisions of this section, which shall address the
Req. No. 15375 Page 2

meth od by which a student is to provide proof to a school district,
public charter school, or virtual charter school that the student
has completed and submitted an application for participation in the
Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program as required by subsection A
of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-15375 AQH 12/08/25












Req. No. 15375 Page 3